Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 2. Uniform Provisions

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to defaulting fiduciaries, see §§

2-3-136

to

2-3-138

.

As to handling of property and investments, see §

2-3-301

et seq.

For provisions of the Uniform Common Trust Fund Act, see §

2-3-401

et seq.

As to mortgages, leases or sale of property, see §

2-3-501

et seq.

As to Wyoming Uniform Principal and Income Act, see §

2-3-801

et seq.

As to executors and administrators generally, see §

2-4-201

et seq.

As to administration of estates of missing persons, see §

2-12-101

et seq.

As to venue and service of process on executors, administrators, guardians and trustees, see §

1-5-108

.

As to appointment of trustee upon dissolution of corporation, see §§

1-31-119

to

1-31-121

.

As to qualifications, powers and duties of receivers, see §§

1-33-101

to

1-33-110

.

As to construction of fiduciary's rights under Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, see §

1-37-105

.

As to guardian and ward generally, see §§

3-1-101

to

3-5-103

.

As to Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, see §§

3-6-101

to

3-6-119

.

As to trust companies generally, see §§

13-5-101

to

13-5-113

.

For authority of banks and trust companies to act as receivers, trustees, administrators, executors and guardians, see §§

13-2-101

and

13-5-101

.

As to accountability of partner as a fiduciary under Uniform Partnership Act, see §

17-21-404

.

As to board of trustees of county hospital, see §

18-8-102

et seq.

For authority of court to appoint trustee to manage amount set aside for children in action for divorce, see §

20-2-314

.

As to exemption of fiduciaries from provisions as to licensing real estate brokers and salesmen, see §

33-28-103

.

As to property, conveyances and security transactions generally, see title 34.

As to Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, see §§

34-13-114

to

34-13-137

.

As to rights and remedies of sureties, surety bonds and surety companies, see title 38.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 15, ch. 90, Laws 1929, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Purpose. —

The Uniform Fiduciaries Act was enacted to establish uniform and definite rules in place of the diverse and indefinite rules then prevailing concerning breaches of fiduciary obligations and to remove undesirable barriers imposed by court decisions on those dealing with fiduciaries. Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part IV,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 155 (1975).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d Trusts § 1 et seq.

Conclusiveness of allowance of account of trustee as respects self-dealing in assets of estate, 1 ALR2d 1060.

Distribution of funds where funds of more than one trust have been commingled by trustee and balance is insufficient to satisfy all trust claims, 17 ALR3d 937.

Liability of testamentary trustee for failure to assert claim against executor of testator's estate for mistake resulting in overpayment of taxes, 68 ALR3d 1265.

Liability of bank for diversion to benefit of presenter or third party of proceeds of check drawn to bank's order by drawer not indebted to bank, 69 ALR4th 778.

33 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators §§ 1 et seq.; 39 C.J.S. Guardian and Ward § 1 et seq.; 90A C.J.S. Trusts §§ 327 to 328, 338 to 339, 343, 349, 381 to 382, 667 to 668.

§ 2-3-201.
Short title.

W.S.

2-3-201

through

2-3-211

may be cited as the “Uniform Fiduciaries Act”.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 43-114; C.S. 1945, § 8-114; W.S. 1957, § 4-1; W.S. 1977, §

4-1-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of the term “this act” as meaning §§

2-3-201

to

2-3-211

, see § 2-3-202(a)(vi).

§ 2-3-202.
Definitions.

In this act unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Bank” includes any person or association of persons, whether incorporated or not, carrying on the business of banking;

“Fiduciary” includes a trustee under any trust, expressed, implied, resulting or constructive, personal representative, guardian, conservator, curator, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for the benefit of creditors, partner, agent, officer of a corporation, public or private, public officer or any other person acting in a fiduciary capacity for any person, trust or estate;

“Person” includes a corporation, partnership or other association or two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest;

“Principal” includes any person to whom a fiduciary as such owes an obligation;

A thing is done “in good faith” within the meaning of this act, when it is in fact done honestly, whether it be done negligently or not;

As used in the Uniform Fiduciaries Act, “this act” means W.S.

2-3-201

through

2-3-211

.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 43-101; C.S. 1945, § 8-101; W.S. 1957, § 4-2; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-102; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For short title provision stating that §§

2-3-201

to

2-3-211

may be cited as the Uniform Fiduciaries Act, see §

2-3-201

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Term “person” includes a corporation such as a bank.

Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

For discussion of authorities defining “in good faith.” —

See Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

Quoted

in

State v. Faulkner, 75 Wyo. 104, 292 P.2d 1045,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1956).

§ 2-3-203.
Responsibility and rights of persons dealing with fiduciaries.

A person who in good faith pays or transfers to a fiduciary any money or other property which the fiduciary as such is authorized to receive is not responsible for the proper application thereof by the fiduciary; and any right or title acquired from the fiduciary in consideration of the payment or transfer is not invalid in consequence of a misapplication by the fiduciary.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 43-102; C.S. 1945, § 8-102; W.S. 1957, § 4-3; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-103; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Term “person” includes a corporation such as a bank.

Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

Person paying in good faith not liable for fiduciary's defalcation. —

If a person or corporation pays, in good faith, money to a fiduciary which the fiduciary is entitled to receive, the paying party is not responsible for defalcation on the part of the fiduciary. Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

Nor for negligence in discovering misappropriation. —

That a man dealing with a fiduciary cannot, in the absence of bad faith, be held responsible for mere neglect in discovering and preventing misappropriation by the fiduciary is supported by ample authority. Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

Applied

in

Chorney v. Chorney, 383 P.2d 859,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1963).

§ 2-3-204.
Liability of bank; payment of checks signed by fiduciary.

If a deposit is made in a bank to the credit of a fiduciary as such, the bank is authorized to pay the amount of the deposit or any part thereof upon the check of the fiduciary, signed with the name in which such deposit is entered, without being liable to the principal, unless the bank pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in drawing the check or with knowledge that its action in paying the check amounts to bad faith. If a check is payable to the drawee bank and is delivered to it in payment of or as security for a personal debt of the fiduciary to it, the bank is liable to the principal if the fiduciary in fact commits a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the check.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 43-107; C.S. 1945, § 8-107; W.S. 1957, § 4-8; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-104; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-3-205.
Liability of bank; when check drawn on principal by fiduciary.

If a check is drawn upon the account of his principal in a bank by a fiduciary who is empowered to draw checks upon his principal’s account, the bank is authorized to pay the check without being liable to the principal, unless the bank pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in drawing the check, or with knowledge that its action in paying the check amounts to bad faith. If a check is payable to the drawee bank and is delivered to it in payment of or as security for a personal debt of the fiduciary to it, the bank is liable to the principal if the fiduciary in fact commits a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the check.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 43-108; C.S. 1945, § 8-108; W.S. 1957, § 4-9; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-105; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-206.
Liability of bank; receiving deposit from fiduciary.

If a fiduciary makes a deposit in a bank to his personal credit of checks drawn by him upon an account in his own name as fiduciary, or of checks payable to him as fiduciary, or of checks drawn by him upon an account in the name of his principal if he is empowered to draw checks thereon, or of checks payable to his principal and endorsed by him, if he is empowered to endorse the checks, or if he otherwise makes a deposit of funds held by him as fiduciary, the bank receiving the deposit is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing thereby a breach of his obligation as fiduciary; and the bank is authorized to pay the amount of the deposit or any part thereof upon the personal check of the fiduciary without being liable to the principal, unless the bank receives the deposit or pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in making the deposit or in drawing the check, or with knowledge that its action in receiving the deposit or paying the check amounts to bad faith.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 43-109; C.S. 1945, § 8-109; W.S. 1957, § 4-10; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-106; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to trust deposits, see §

2-1-203

.

Section based on public policy. —

The rule limiting liability of banks dealing with fiduciaries is, to a more or less, extent based upon public policy. Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

Not liable for fiduciary's defalcation if payment made in good faith. —

If a person or corporation pays, in good faith, money to a fiduciary which the fiduciary is entitled to receive, the paying party is not responsible for defalcation on the part of the fiduciary. Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

§ 2-3-207.
Liability of bank; when check drawn by trustee.

When a deposit is made in a bank in the name of two (2) or more persons as trustees and a check is drawn upon the trust account by any trustee or trustees authorized by the other trustee or trustees to draw checks upon the trust account, neither the payee nor other holder nor the bank is bound to inquire whether it is a breach of trust to authorize the trustee or trustees to draw checks upon the trust account, and is not liable unless the circumstances are such that the action of the payee or other holder or the bank amounts to bad faith.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 43-110; C.S. 1945, § 8-110; W.S. 1957, § 4-11; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-107; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-208.
Succession of fiduciary powers when bank consolidates with another.

In the event of the merger or the consolidation of any bank, banking association, loan and trust company, named as personal representative, trustee under trust agreement, guardian of minors or incompetents, trustee for bond issue, escrow agent, holder of real estate titles, receiver or agent, the successor of the bank, banking association, or loan and trust company, shall by virtue of the merger, consolidation or succession, succeed to all the fiduciary powers, privileges, benefits, obligations, duties and liabilities of its predecessor, and shall carry out all the duties and obligations imposed upon its predecessor as the personal representative, trustee under trust agreement, guardian of minors or incompetents, trustee for bond issue, escrow agent, holder of real estate titles, receiver or agent, as if it had been originally named in the instrument or instruments creating the fiduciary relation.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 91, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 43-115; C.S. 1945, § 8-115; W.S. 1957, § 4-12; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-108; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 91, Laws 1931, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 2-3-209.
Applicability; generally.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to transactions taking place prior to the time when it takes effect.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 11; R.S. 1931, § 43-111; C.S. 1945, § 8-111; W.S. 1957, § 4-13; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-109; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see §

2-3-201

and notes thereto.

§ 2-3-210.
Applicability; rules of law and equity.

In any case not provided for in this act, the rules of law and equity, including the law merchant and those rules of law and equity relating to trusts, agency, negotiable instruments and banking, shall continue to apply.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 43-112; C.S. 1945, § 8-112; W.S. 1957, § 4-14; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-110; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see §

2-3-201

.

Cited

in

Kerper v. Kerper, 780 P.2d 923,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1989); Shriners Hosps. for Children v. First Northern Bank of Wyo., 2016 WY 51, 373 P.3d 392,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 2-3-211.
Interpretation and construction.

This act shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 90, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 43-113; C.S. 1945, § 8-113; W.S. 1957, § 4-15; W.S. 1977, § 4-1-111; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see §

2-3-201

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).